North Dakota, session 69, HB1230.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 36-01-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
36-01-36. Federally sponsored animal identification program - Premises
identification, animal identification, and animal tracking - Open records - Exception.
1. The state veterinarian shall serve as the state's administrator and allocator for any
federally sponsored animal identification program pertaining to cattle, horses, and
mules.
2. The board shall maintain the confidentiality of information created, collected, or
maintained by the state veterinarian for purposes of premises identification, animal
identification, or animal tracking, including the name and address of the owner or
lessee of the property where an animal is found, is located.
2.3. The information described in subsection 12 is not subject to section 44-04-18 and may
not be disclosed unless:
a. Every individual who is the subject of the information provides written consent to
the release of information;
b. The disclosure is authorized pursuant to federal law;
c. The disclosure is necessary to provide a state or federal agency with information
to assist in animal disease control or tracing an animal disease;
Page No. 1 25.0301.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
d. The disclosure is to the attorney general or to law enforcement to assist in a
criminal investigation; or
e. A court of competent jurisdiction orders the disclosure; or
f. The disclosure is to provide the North Dakota stockmen's association with
information pursuant to section 4.1-72-05.
3.4. A person violating this section is subject to the remedies set forth in section
44-04-21.2. For purposes of applying section 44-04-21.2, "public entity" includes any
person that has contracted with the state for the provision of services related to a
premises identification, animal identification, or animal tracking database program.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Sections 4.1-72-05 and 4.1-72-06 of the North Dakota Century
Code are repealed.
Page No. 2 25.0301.01000